Hawaii statutes.
§326-37 Sheriff, duties. The sheriff
of the county of Kalawao shall preserve the public peace and shall arrest and
take before the district judge for examination all persons who attempt to
commit or who have committed a public offense and prosecute the same to the
best of the sheriff's ability. [L 1905, c 39, §5; RL 1925, §1580; RL 1935,
§2931; RL 1945, §2441; RL 1955, §50-38; HRS §326-37; am L 1970, c 188, §39; gen
ch 1985; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next